cs: Styl stopky: Argentinské; Zahnuté; Gag; Dlouhé; S drážkou ve tvaru S; Krátké; S drážkou; Rovné; Zahnuté dozadu / pastevní; Tom Thumb; Jiné
tr: Şaft stili: Arjantin; Kavisli; Gag; Uzun; S şekilli; Kısa; Oluklu; Düz; Geriye kıvrık/otlama; Tom Thumb; Diğer
sk-SK: Štýl stopky: Argentínske; Zakrivené; Gag; Dlhé; V tvare S; Krátke; S otvormi; Rovné; Zahnuté dozadu/Grazing; Tom Thumb; Iné
th: สไตล์ก้าน: อาร์เจนตินา; โค้ง; แก๊ก; ยาว; รูปตัว S; สั้น; เจาะร่อง; ตรง; โค้งไปด้านหลัง/เกรซิง; ทอมธัมบ์; อื่นๆ
sv: Typ av skaft: Argentinsk; Böjd; Gag; Lång; S-skänkel; Kort; Slitsad; Rak; Bakåtsvept/betande; Tom Thumb; Övrigt
hr-HR: Stil drške: Argentinski; Zakrivljeni; Gag; Dugi; S-poluga; Kratki; S prorezom; Ravni; Zabačeni/grazing; Tom Thumb; Drugo
fr: Type de branches du mors: Argentine; Courbe; Releveur; Longue; En S; Courte; Fendue; Droite; Inclinée vers l’arrière/grazing; Tom Thumb; Autre
sl-SI: Stil stranskega dela žvale: Argentinska; Ukrivljena; Gag; Dolga; S-oblika; Kratka; Z režo; Ravna; Nazaj ukrivljena/pašna; Tom Thumb; Drugo
nb: Skaftstil: Argentinsk; Buet; Gag; Lang; S-stang; Kort; Med spor; Rett; Bakoverbøyd/grazing; Tom Thumb; Annet
lt-LT: Kojelės stilius: Argentinietiškas; Lenktas; Keltuvinis (Gag); Ilgas; S formos; Trumpas; Su išpjova; Tiesus; Atloštas / ganymosi; Tom Thumb; Kita
pl: Styl czanka: Argentyńska; Zakrzywiona; Gag; Długa; W kształcie litery S; Krótka; Z wycięciami; Prosta; Odchylona do tyłu/Grazing; Tom Thumb; Inne
it: Stile delle branche: Argentino; Curvo; Elevatore; Lungo; A S; Corto; Fessurato; Dritto; Inclinato all’indietro/Grazing; Tom Thumb; Altro
zh-TW: 柄身類型: 阿根廷式; 彎曲式; 提韁式; 長式; S 型; 短式; 開槽式; 直式; 後掠/放牧式; 湯姆指; 其他
vi: Kiểu cán: Argentine; Cong; Gag; Dài; S-shank; Ngắn; Có khe; Thẳng; Vuốt ngược/Grazing; Tom Thumb; Khác
ko: 섕크 방식: 아르헨틴; 곡선형; 개그; 롱; S-섕크; 쇼트; 슬롯형; 직선형; 스웹백/그레이징; 톰 엄; 기타
en: Shank style: Argentine; Curved; Gag; Long; S-shank; Short; Slotted; Straight; Swept-back/Grazing; Tom Thumb; Other
de: Stil des Schafts: Argentinisch; Gebogen; Aufziehtrense; Lang; S-Anzug; Kurz; Geschlitzt; Gerade; Zurückgebogen/Grazing; Tom Thumb; Sonstige
ru: Стиль щечек мундштука: Аргентинский; Изогнутый; Гэг; Длинный; S-образный; Короткий; С прорезями; Прямой; Отогнутый назад / Грейзинг; Том Там; Другой
da: Skankstil: Argentinsk; Buet; Gag; Lang; S-schenkel; Kort; Med slidser; Lige; Tilbagestrøgen/grazing; Tom Thumb; Andet
ro-RO: Stil de pârghie: Argentinian; Curbat; Gag; Lung; În formă de S; Scurt; Cu fante; Drept; Înclinat înapoi / Grazing; Tom Thumb; Altele
es: Estilo de vástago: Argentino; Curvo; Elevador; Largo; Pata en S; Corto; Ranurado; Recto; Inclinado hacia atrás/pastoreo; Tom Thumb; Otro
hu: Szár stílusa: Argentin; Ívelt; Felhúzó zabla; Hosszú; S-szárú; Rövid; Hornyos; Egyenes; Hátrahajló/legelős; Tom Thumb; Egyéb
zh-CN: 衔铁柄款式: 阿根廷式; 弯曲式; 提勒式; 长款; S 型; 短款; 开槽式; 直型; 后掠式/吃草式; Tom Thumb; 其他
pt-PT: Estilo de haste: Argentina; Curva; Elevadora; Comprida; Haste em S; Curta; Ranhurada; Reta; Inclinada para trás; Tom Thumb; Outro
fi: Varren tyyli: Argentine; Kaareva; Gag; Pitkä; S-varsi; Lyhyt; Urallinen; Suora; Taaksepäin kaartuva / laidunnus; Tom Thumb; Muu
pt-BR: Haste estilo: Argentino; Curvo; Gag; Longo; Haste em S; Curto; Ranhurado; Reto; Inclinado para trás/Grazing; Tom Thumb; Outro
el: Στυλ στελέχους: Αργεντίνικο; Κυρτό; Gag; Μακρύ; Σχήμα S; Κοντό; Με σχισμή; Ίσιο; Κεκλιμένο προς τα πίσω/Grazing; Tom Thumb; Άλλο
ja: シャンクスタイル: アルゼンチン; カーブ; ギャグ; ロング; Sシャンク; ショート; スロット; ストレート; スウェプトバック/グレーシング; トムサム; その他
bg-BG: Тип на опашката (държача): Аржентински; Извит; Гаг; Дълъг; S-образен; Къс; С прорези; Прав; Наклонен назад/за паша; Том Тъм; Друго
nl: Bit schachtstijl: Argentijns; Gebogen; Gag; Lang; S-vormig; Kort; Met gleuf; Recht; Naar achteren gebogen/Grazing; Tom Thumb; Overig